Utah statutes.
17-27a-601.   Enactment of subdivision ordinance.

(1)  The legislative body of a county may enact ordinances requiring that a subdivision plat comply with the provisions of the ordinance and this part before:

(a)  it may be filed or recorded in the county recorder's office; and

(b)  lots may be sold.

(2)  If the legislative body fails to enact a subdivision ordinance, the county may regulate subdivisions only as provided in this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 254, 2005 General Session

